New Jersey, session 222, A3979.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.         A hospital service corporation contract that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1938, c.366 (C.17:48-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema.  The expenses for which coverage shall be provided shall include compression garments for all of the subscribers affected extremities, manual lymphatic drainage, medical nutrition therapy, mental health care, lipectomy that is determined to be medically necessary by the subscribers surgeon, and pre-and post-lipectomy appointments with the subscribers physician and surgeon. b.    To receive coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, a hospital service corporation shall only require a subscriber to provide documentation from the subscribers physician diagnosing the subscriber with lipedema and, if applicable, documentation from the subscribers surgeon that includes photographs of the subscriber that support the diagnosis and information on the number of lipectomies the subscribers surgeon deems medically necessary.  If a hospital service corporation denies coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, the hospital service corporation shall provide the subscriber with a detailed explanation of the reason for the denial.  A hospital service corporation shall not deny coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema solely based on photographs of the subscriber submitted pursuant to this subsection. c.     A hospital service corporation shall provide coverage for the total number of lipectomies deemed medically necessary by the subscribers surgeon and shall not require a subscribers surgeon to remove less fat than the surgeon deems medically necessary to be removed from the subscriber during a lipectomy in order to receive coverage. d.    Prior authorization for a lipectomy shall be in accordance with prior authorization requirements established pursuant to the Ensuring Transparency in Prior Authorization Act, P.L.2023, c.296 (C.17B:30-55.1 et al.). e.     The benefits provided by this section shall be provided to the same extent and with the same deductibles, coinsurance, and other cost sharing as apply to similar services under the contract and shall be consistent with the current standard of care for lipedema. f.     This section shall apply to those hospital service corporation contracts in which the hospital service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. 2.    a.         A medical service corporation contract that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1940, c.74 (C.17:48A-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema.  The expenses for which coverage shall be provided shall include compression garments for all of the subscribers affected extremities, manual lymphatic drainage, medical nutrition therapy, mental health care, lipectomy that is determined to be medically necessary by the subscribers surgeon, and pre-and post-lipectomy appointments with the subscribers physician and surgeon. b.    To receive coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, a medical service corporation shall only require a subscriber to provide documentation from the subscribers physician diagnosing the subscriber with lipedema and, if applicable, documentation from the subscribers surgeon that includes photographs of the subscriber that support the diagnosis and information on the number of lipectomies the subscribers surgeon deems medically necessary.  If a medical service corporation denies coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, the medical service corporation shall provide the subscriber with a detailed explanation of the reason for the denial. A medical service corporation shall not deny coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema solely based on photographs of the subscriber submitted pursuant to this subsection. c.     A medical service corporation shall provide coverage for the total number of lipectomies deemed medically necessary by the subscribers surgeon and shall not require a subscribers surgeon to remove less fat than the surgeon deems medically necessary to be removed from the subscriber during a lipectomy in order to receive coverage. d.    Prior authorization for a lipectomy shall be in accordance with prior authorization requirements established pursuant to the Ensuring Transparency in Prior Authorization Act, P.L.2023, c.296 (C.17B:30-55.1 et al.). e.     The benefits provided by this section shall be provided to the same extent and with the same deductibles, coinsurance, and other cost sharing as apply to similar services under the contract and shall be consistent with the current standard of care for lipedema. f.     This section shall apply to those medical service corporation contracts in which the hospital service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. 3.    a.         A health service corporation contract that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1985, c.236 (C.17:48E-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema.  The expenses for which coverage shall be provided shall include compression garments for all of the subscribers affected extremities, manual lymphatic drainage, medical nutrition therapy, mental health care, lipectomy that is determined to be medically necessary by the subscribers surgeon, and pre-and post-lipectomy appointments with the subscribers physician and surgeon. b.    To receive coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, a health service corporation shall only require a subscriber to provide documentation from the subscribers physician diagnosing the subscriber with lipedema and, if applicable, documentation from the subscribers surgeon that includes photographs of the subscriber that support the diagnosis and information on the number of lipectomies the subscribers surgeon deems medically necessary.    If a health service corporation denies coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, the health service corporation shall provide the subscriber with a detailed explanation of the reason for the denial. A health service corporation shall not deny coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema solely based on photographs of the subscriber submitted pursuant to this subsection. c.     A health service corporation shall provide coverage for the total number of lipectomies deemed medically necessary by the subscribers surgeon and shall not require a subscribers surgeon to remove less fat than the surgeon deems medically necessary to be removed from the subscriber during a lipectomy in order to receive coverage. d.    Prior authorization for a lipectomy shall be in accordance with prior authorization requirements established pursuant to the Ensuring Transparency in Prior Authorization Act, P.L.2023, c.296 (C.17B:30-55.1 et al.). e.     The benefits provided by this section shall be provided to the same extent and with the same deductibles, coinsurance, and other cost sharing as apply to similar services under the contract and shall be consistent with the current standard of care for lipedema. f.     This section shall apply to those health service corporation contracts in which the hospital service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. 4.    a.         An individual health insurance policy that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to N.J.S.17B:26-1 et seq., or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema.  The expenses for which coverage shall be provided shall include compression garments for all of the insureds affected extremities, manual lymphatic drainage, medical nutrition therapy, mental health care, lipectomy that is determined to be medically necessary by the insureds surgeon, and pre-and post-lipectomy appointments with the insureds physician and surgeon. b.    To receive coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, an individual health insurance policy shall only require an insured to provide documentation from the insureds physician diagnosing the insured with lipedema and, if applicable, documentation from the insureds surgeon that includes photographs of the insured that support the diagnosis and information on the number of lipectomies the insureds surgeon deems medically necessary.  If an individual health insurance policy denies coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, the individual health insurance policy shall provide the insured with a detailed explanation of the reason for the denial.  An individual health insurance policy shall not deny coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema solely based on photographs of the insured submitted pursuant to this subsection. c.     An individual health insurance policy shall provide coverage for the total number of lipectomies deemed medically necessary by the insureds surgeon and shall not require an insureds surgeon to remove less fat than the surgeon deems medically necessary to be removed from the insured during a lipectomy in order to receive coverage. d.    Prior authorization for a lipectomy shall be in accordance with prior authorization requirements established pursuant to the Ensuring Transparency in Prior Authorization Act, P.L.2023, c.296 (C.17B:30-55.1 et al.). e.     The benefits provided by this section shall be provided to the same extent and with the same deductibles, coinsurance, and other cost sharing as apply to similar services under the policy and shall be consistent with the current standard of care for lipedema. f.     This section shall apply to those individual health insurance policies in which the individual health insurance policy has reserved the right to change the premium. 5.    a.         A group health insurance policy that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to N.J.S.17B:27-26 et seq., or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema.  The expenses for which coverage shall be provided shall include compression garments for all of the insureds affected extremities, manual lymphatic drainage, medical nutrition therapy, mental health care, lipectomy that is determined to be medically necessary by the insureds surgeon, and pre-and post-lipectomy appointments with the insureds physician and surgeon. b.    To receive coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, a group health insurance policy shall only require an insured to provide documentation from the insureds physician diagnosing the insured with lipedema and, if applicable, documentation from the insureds surgeon that includes photographs of the insured that support the diagnosis and information on the number of lipectomies the insureds surgeon deems medically necessary.  If a group health insurance policy denies coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, the group health insurance policy shall provide the insured with a detailed explanation of the reason for the denial.  A group health insurance policy shall not deny coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema solely based on photographs of the insured submitted pursuant to this subsection. c.     A group health insurance policy shall provide coverage for the total number of lipectomies deemed medically necessary by the insureds surgeon and shall not require an insureds surgeon to remove less fat than the surgeon deems medically necessary to be removed from the insured during a lipectomy in order to receive coverage. d.    Prior authorization for a lipectomy shall be in accordance with prior authorization requirements established pursuant to the Ensuring Transparency in Prior Authorization Act, P.L.2023, c.296 (C.17B:30-55.1 et al.). e.     The benefits provided by this section shall be provided to the same extent and with the same deductibles, coinsurance, and other cost sharing as apply to similar services under the policy and shall be consistent with the current standard of care for lipedema. f.     This section shall apply to those group health insurance policies in which the group health insurance policy has reserved the right to change the premium. 6.    a.         An individual health benefits plan that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-2 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema.  The expenses for which coverage shall be provided shall include compression garments for all of the covered persons affected extremities, manual lymphatic drainage, medical nutrition therapy, mental health care, lipectomy that is determined to be medically necessary by the covered persons surgeon, and pre-and post-lipectomy appointments with the covered persons physician and surgeon. b.    To receive coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, an individual health benefits plan shall only require an insured to provide documentation from the covered persons physician diagnosing the covered person with lipedema and, if applicable, documentation from the covered persons surgeon that includes photographs of the covered person that support the diagnosis and information on the number of lipectomies the covered persons surgeon deems medically necessary.  If an individual health benefits plan denies coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, the individual health benefits plan shall provide the covered person with a detailed explanation of the reason for the denial.  An individual health benefits plan shall not deny coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema solely based on photographs of the covered person submitted pursuant to this subsection. c.     An individual health benefits plan shall provide coverage for the total number of lipectomies deemed medically necessary by the covered persons surgeon and shall not require a covered persons surgeon to remove less fat than the surgeon deems medically necessary to be removed from the covered person during a lipectomy in order to receive coverage. d.    Prior authorization for a lipectomy shall be in accordance with prior authorization requirements established pursuant to the Ensuring Transparency in Prior Authorization Act, P.L.2023, c.296 (C.17B:30-55.1 et al.). e.     The benefits provided by this section shall be provided to the same extent and with the same deductibles, coinsurance, and other cost sharing as apply to similar services under the health benefits plan and shall be consistent with the current standard of care for lipedema. f.     This section shall apply to those health benefits plans in which the carrier has reserved the right to change the premium. 7.    a.         A small employer health benefits plan that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1992, c.162 (C.17B:27A-17 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema.  The expenses for which coverage shall be provided shall include compression garments for all of the covered persons affected extremities, manual lymphatic drainage, medical nutrition therapy, mental health care, lipectomy that is determined to be medically necessary by the covered persons surgeon, and pre-and post-lipectomy appointments with the covered persons physician and surgeon. b.    To receive coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, a small employer health benefits plan shall only require a covered person to provide documentation from the covered persons physician diagnosing the covered person with lipedema and, if applicable, documentation from the covered persons surgeon that includes photographs of the covered person that support the diagnosis and  information on the number of lipectomies the covered persons surgeon deems medically necessary.  If a small employer health benefits plan denies coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, the small employer health benefits plan shall provide the covered person with a detailed explanation of the reason for the denial.  A small employer health benefits plan shall not deny coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema solely based on photographs of the covered person submitted pursuant to this subsection. c.     A small employer health benefits plan shall provide coverage for the total number of lipectomies deemed medically necessary by the covered persons surgeon and shall not require a covered persons surgeon to remove less fat than the surgeon deems medically necessary to be removed from the covered person during a lipectomy in order to receive coverage. d.    Prior authorization for a lipectomy shall be in accordance with prior authorization requirements established pursuant to the Ensuring Transparency in Prior Authorization Act, P.L.2023, c.296 (C.17B:30-55.1 et al.). e.     The benefits provided by this section shall be provided to the same extent and with the same deductibles, coinsurance, and other cost sharing as apply to similar services under the health benefits plan and shall be consistent with the current standard of care for lipedema. f.     This section shall apply to those health benefits plans in which the carrier has reserved the right to change the premium. 8.    a.         A health maintenance organization contract for health care services that is delivered, issued, executed, or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1973, c.337 (C.26:2J-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema.  The expenses for which coverage shall be provided shall include compression garments for all of the enrollees affected extremities, manual lymphatic drainage, medical nutrition therapy, mental health care, lipectomy that is determined to be medically necessary by the enrollees surgeon, and pre-and post-lipectomy appointments with the enrollees physician and surgeon. b.    To receive coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, a health maintenance organization plan shall only require an enrollee to provide documentation from the enrollees physician diagnosing the enrollee with lipedema and, if applicable, documentation from the enrollees surgeon that includes photographs of the enrollee that support the diagnosis and information on the number of lipectomies the enrollees surgeon deems medically necessary.  If a health maintenance organization denies coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, the health maintenance organization shall provide the enrollee with a detailed explanation of the reason for the denial.  A health maintenance organization shall not deny coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema solely based on photographs of the enrollee submitted pursuant to this subsection. c.     A health maintenance organization shall provide coverage for the total number of lipectomies deemed medically necessary by the enrollees surgeon and shall not require an enrollees surgeon to remove less fat than the surgeon deems medically necessary to be removed from the enrollee during a lipectomy in order to receive coverage. d.    Prior authorization for a lipectomy shall be in accordance with prior authorization requirements established pursuant to the Ensuring Transparency in Prior Authorization Act, P.L.2023, c.296 (C.17B:30-55.1 et al.). e.     The benefits provided by this section shall be provided to the same extent and with the same deductibles, coinsurance, and other cost sharing as apply to similar services under the contract and shall be consistent with the current standard of care for lipedema. f.     This section shall apply to those contracts for health care services under which the health maintenance organization has reserved the right to change the schedule of charges for enrollee coverage. 9.    a.         The State Health Benefits Commission shall ensure that every contract purchased by the commission on or after the effective date of this act that provides hospital and medical expense benefits shall provide coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema.  The expenses for which coverage shall be provided shall include compression garments for all of the covered persons affected extremities, manual lymphatic drainage, medical nutrition therapy, mental health care, lipectomy that is determined to be medically necessary by the covered persons surgeon, and pre-and post-lipectomy appointments with the covered persons physician and surgeon. b.    To receive coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, a contract purchased by the commission shall only require a covered person to provide documentation from the covered persons physician diagnosing the covered person with lipedema and, if applicable, documentation from the covered persons surgeon that includes photographs of the covered person that support the diagnosis and  information on the number of lipectomies the covered persons surgeon deems medically necessary.  If a contract purchased by the commission denies coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, the contract purchased by the commission shall provide the covered person with a detailed explanation of the reason for the denial.  A contract purchased by the commission shall not deny coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema solely based on photographs of the covered person submitted pursuant to this subsection. c.     A contract purchased by the commission shall provide coverage for the total number of lipectomies deemed medically necessary by the covered persons surgeon and shall not require a covered persons surgeon to remove less fat than the surgeon deems medically necessary to be removed from the covered person during a lipectomy in order to receive coverage. d.    Prior authorization for a lipectomy shall be in accordance with prior authorization requirements established pursuant to the Ensuring Transparency in Prior Authorization Act, P.L.2023, c.296 (C.17B:30-55.1 et al.). e.     The benefits provided by this section shall be provided to the same extent and with the same deductibles, coinsurance, and other cost sharing as apply to similar services under the contract and shall be consistent with the current standard of care for lipedema. 10.  a.         The School Employees Health Benefits Commission shall ensure that every contract purchased by the commission on or after the effective date of this act that provides hospital and medical expense benefits shall provide coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema.  The expenses for which coverage shall be provided shall include compression garments for all of the covered persons affected extremities, manual lymphatic drainage, medical nutrition therapy, mental health care, lipectomy that is determined to be medically necessary by the covered persons surgeon, and pre-and post-lipectomy appointments with the covered persons physician and surgeon. b.    To receive coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, a contract purchased by the commission shall only require a covered person to provide documentation from the covered persons physician diagnosing the covered person with lipedema and, if applicable, documentation from the covered persons surgeon that includes photographs of the covered person that support the diagnosis and information on the number of lipectomies the covered persons surgeon deems medically necessary.  If a contract purchased by the commission denies coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema, the contract purchased by the commission shall provide the covered person with a detailed explanation of the reason for the denial.  A contract purchased by the commission shall not deny coverage for expenses incurred for the treatment of lipedema solely based on photographs of the covered person submitted pursuant to this subsection. c.     A contract purchased by the commission shall provide coverage for the total number of lipectomies deemed medically necessary by the covered persons surgeon and shall not require a covered persons surgeon to remove less fat than the surgeon deems medically necessary to be removed from the covered person during a lipectomy in order to receive coverage. d.    Prior authorization for a lipectomy shall be in accordance with prior authorization requirements established pursuant to the Ensuring Transparency in Prior Authorization Act, P.L.2023, c.296 (C.17B:30-55.1 et al.). e.     The benefits provided by this section shall be provided to the same extent and with the same deductibles, coinsurance, and other cost sharing as apply to similar services under the contract and shall be consistent with the current standard of care for lipedema. 11.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month next following enactment and shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed after that date.